Connecticut, session 2026, HB05547.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 9-610 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(e) For purposes of this subsection and subsection (f) of this section,
the exclusions to the term "contribution" in subsection (b) of section 9-
601a shall not apply; [the term] "state office" means the office of
Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State Comptroller,
State Treasurer or Secretary of the State; [and the term] "state officer"
means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, State
Comptroller, State Treasurer or Secretary of the State; "municipal office"
means an elective office for which only the electors of a single town, city,
borough or political subdivision may vote, but does not include the
office of state senator or state representative; "municipal officer" means
sHB5547 / File No. 552 1

sHB5547 File No. 552
an elected officer for which only the electors of a single town, city,
borough or political subdivision were permitted to vote, but does not
include a state senator or state representative; and "political
subdivision" has the same meaning as provided in section 9-372.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, [to the contrary,] during
any regular session of the General Assembly, during any special session
of the General Assembly held between the adjournment of the regular
session in an odd-numbered year and the convening of the regular
session in the following even-numbered year or during any reconvened
session of the General Assembly held in an odd-numbered year to
reconsider vetoed bills, (1) no lobbyist or political committee established
by or on behalf of a lobbyist shall make or offer to make a contribution
to or on behalf of, and no lobbyist shall solicit a contribution on behalf
of, (A) a candidate or exploratory committee established by a candidate
for nomination or election to the General Assembly, [or] a state office, a
municipal office or the office of judge of probate, or (B) a political
committee (i) established for an assembly or senatorial district, (ii)
established by a member of the General Assembly, [or] a state officer, a
municipal officer, a judge of probate or such [member or officer's]
member's, officer's or judge's agent, or in consultation with, or at the
request or suggestion of, any such member, officer, judge or agent, or
(iii) controlled by such member, officer, judge or agent, to aid or
promote the nomination or election of any candidate or candidates to
the General Assembly, [or] a state office, a municipal office or the office
of judge of probate, and (2) no such candidate or political committee
shall accept such a contribution. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to a candidate committee established by a member of the
General Assembly or a candidate for nomination or election to the
General Assembly, at a special election for the General Assembly, from
the date on which the candidate or the [chairman] chairperson of the
committee files the designation of a treasurer and a depository
institution under section 9-602 with the State Elections Enforcement
Commission, to the date on which the special election is held, inclusive.
[, or to an exploratory committee established by a member of the
General Assembly to promote his candidacy for an office other than the
sHB5547 / File No. 552 2

sHB5547 File No. 552
General Assembly.]
Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 9-608 of the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(f) If an exploratory committee has been established by a candidate
pursuant to subsection (c) of section 9-604, the treasurer of the
committee shall file a notice of intent to dissolve it with the appropriate
authority not later than fifteen days after the candidate's declaration of
intent to seek nomination or election to a particular public office, except
that in the case of an exploratory committee established by a candidate
for purposes that include aiding or promoting the candidate's candidacy
for nomination or election to the General Assembly or a state office, the
treasurer of the committee shall file such notice of intent to dissolve the
committee not later than fifteen days after the earlier of: (1) The
candidate's declaration of intent to seek nomination or election to a
particular public office, (2) the candidate's endorsement at a convention,
caucus or town committee meeting, or (3) the candidate's filing of a
candidacy for nomination under section 9-400 or 9-405. The treasurer
shall also file a statement identifying all contributions received or
expenditures made by the exploratory committee since the previous
statement and the balance on hand or deficit, as the case may be. In the
event of a surplus, the treasurer shall, not later than the filing of the
statement, distribute the surplus to the candidate committee established
pursuant to said section, except that [(A)] in the case of a surplus of an
exploratory committee established by a candidate who intends to be a
participating candidate, as defined in section 9-703, in the Citizens'
Election Program, the treasurer may distribute to the candidate
committee only that portion of such surplus that is attributable to
contributions that meet the criteria for qualifying contributions for the
candidate committee under section 9-704 and shall distribute the
remainder of such surplus to the Citizens' Election Fund established in
section 9-701. [, and (B) in the case of a surplus of an exploratory
committee established for nomination or election to an office other than
the General Assembly or a state office (i) the treasurer may only
distribute to the candidate committee for nomination or election to the
sHB5547 / File No. 552 3

sHB5547 File No. 552
General Assembly or state office of such candidate that portion of such
surplus which is in excess of the total contributions which the
exploratory committee received from lobbyists or political committees
established by lobbyists, during any period in which the prohibitions in
subsection (e) of section 9-610 apply, and (ii) any remaining amount
shall be returned to all such lobbyists and political committees
established by or on behalf of lobbyists, on a prorated basis of
contribution, or distributed to any charitable organization which is a
tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code
of the United States, as from time to time amended.] If the candidate
decides not to seek nomination or election to any office, the treasurer
shall, within fifteen days after such decision, comply with the provisions
of this subsection and distribute any surplus in the manner provided by
this section for political committees other than those formed for ongoing
political activities, except that if the surplus is from an exploratory
committee established by the State Treasurer, any portion of the surplus
100 that is received from a principal of an investment services firm or a
101 political committee established by such firm shall be returned to such
102 principal or committee on a prorated basis of contribution. In the event
103 of a deficit, the treasurer shall file a statement thirty days after the
104 decision or declaration with the proper authority and, thereafter, on the
105 seventh day of each month following if on the last day of the previous
106 month there was an increase or decrease in such deficit in excess of five
107 hundred dollars from that reported on the last statement filed. The
108 treasurer shall file supplemental statements until the deficit is
109 eliminated. If the exploratory committee does not have a surplus or
110 deficit, the statement filed after the candidate's declaration or decision
111 shall be the last required statement. If a candidate certifies on the
112 statement of organization for the exploratory committee pursuant to
113 subsection (c) of section 9-604 that the candidate will not be a candidate
114 for the office of state representative and subsequently establishes a
115 candidate committee for the office of state representative, the treasurer
116 of the candidate committee shall pay to the State Treasurer, for deposit
117 in the General Fund, an amount equal to the portion of any contribution
sHB5547 / File No. 552 4

sHB5547 File No. 552
118 received by said exploratory committee that exceeded two hundred fifty
119 dollars. As used in this subsection, "principal of an investment services
120 firm" has the meaning set forth in subsection (e) of section 9-612 and
121 "state office" has the same meaning set forth in subsection (e) of section
122 9-610, as amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 9-610(e)
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 9-608(f)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(e), "political subdivision, as defined in section 9-372," was
changed to "political subdivision" to delete redundant language.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5547 / File No. 552 5

sHB5547 File No. 552
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill expands the current ban on contributions and solicitations by
lobbyists and lobbyist political action committees (PACs) to include
municipal and probate elections, resulting in no fiscal impact to the state
or municipalities.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5547 / File No. 552 6

sHB5547 File No. 552
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5547
AN ACT CONCERNING LOBBYIST CONTRIBUTIONS DURING
LEGISLATIVE SESSIONS.